Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 332.31, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Debt buyer. "Debt buyer" means a business engaged in the purchase of any charged-off account, bill, or other indebtedness for collection purposes, whether the business collects the account, bill, or other indebtedness, hires a third party for collection, or hires an attorney for litigation related to the collection.new text begin Debt buyer does not include a nonprofit organization purchasing a charged-off account, bill, or other indebtedness for charitable purposes.new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MEDICAL DEBT RELIEF; REPORT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to Undue Medical Debt to relieve the medical debt of eligible residents who were unable to pay medical bills after reasonable collections efforts undertaken by hospital providers were completed. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin Undue Medical Debt must share information with the commissioner of commerce and the attorney general regarding the number and characteristics of the residents who have had medical debts relieved under this appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end